South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3282.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 57-1-410 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 57-1-410.  The commission shall appoint, with the advice and consent of the Senate, a Effective January 15, 2028, the lieutenant governor shall serve as the Secretary of Transportation who shall serve at the pleasure of the commission. AIn selecting a candidate for lieutenant governor, a candidate for governor shall examine whether a person appointed to this position shall possess practical and successful business and executive ability and be knowledgeable in the field of transportation. The Secretary of Transportation shall receive such compensation as may be established under the provisions of Section 8-11-160 and for which funds have been authorized in the general appropriations act. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----